Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.120

Injunction, who is bound by.

An order of injunction shall bind every person and officer restrained from the time he or she is informed thereof.

[ 2011 c 336 s 198; Code 1881 s 163; 1877 p 33 s 163; 1869 p 40 s 161; 1854 p 153 s 121; RRS s 729.]